Utah statutes.
78B-15-406.   Penalty for releasing information.

A person who intentionally or knowingly, releases confidential information from the Office of Vital Records which is filed pursuant to Section 78B-15-401 to a person or agency not authorized to receive the information under Section 78B-15-405 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

